vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Bộ phận & linh kiện tàu thuyền > Phù tùng động cơ tàu thủy: Máy phát điện tàu thủy; Linh kiện & bộ chế hòa khí tàu thủy; Bộ điều khiển động cơ tàu thủy; Phụ kiện đánh lửa của tàu thủy; Cánh quạt tàu thủy; Khóa động cơ tàu thuyền; Cao su chân máy tàu thuyền; Piston & linh kiện tàu thuyền; Chân vịt tàu thủy
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Onderdelen en accessoirs voor vaartuigen > Motorbesturingen voor vaartuigen: Dynamo's voor vaartuigen; Carburatoren en onderdelen voor vaartuigen; Motorbediening voor vaartuigen; Ontstekingsonderdelen voor vaartuigen; Rotoren voor vaartuigen; Motorsloten voor vaartuigen; Motorbevestiging voor vaartuigen; Zuigers en onderdelen voor vaartuigen; Propellers voor vaartuigen
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Piese și accesorii pentru ambarcațiuni > Piese motor ambarcațiuni: Alternatoare ambarcațiuni; Carburatoare și piese ambarcațiuni; Comenzi motor ambarcațiuni; Piese aprindere ambarcațiuni; Rotoare ambarcațiuni; Dispozitive de blocare motor pentru ambarcațiuni; Carcase motor ambarcațiuni; Pistoane și piese ambarcațiuni; Elice ambarcațiuni
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Deli in dodatki za vodna plovila > Deli motorjev za vodna plovila: Alternatorji za vodna plovila; Uplinjači in deli za vodna plovila; Krmilniki motorjev za vodna plovila; Deli za vžig za vodna plovila; Impelerji za vodna plovila; Blokade motorjev za vodna plovila; Nosilci motorja za vodna plovila; Bati in deli za vodna plovila; Propelerji za vodna plovila
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ για σκάφη > Ανταλλακτικά κινητήρων σκαφών: Εναλλάκτες ρεύματος σκαφών; Καρμπιρατέρ και εξαρτήματα σκαφών; Χειριστήρια κινητήρα σκαφών; Ανταλλακτικά ανάφλεξης σκαφών; Πτερωτές σκαφών; Κλειδαριές κινητήρα σκαφών; Βάσεις κινητήρων σκαφών; Έμβολα & εξαρτήματα σκαφών; Έλικες σκαφών
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Båtdeler og -tilbehør > Motordeler for båt: Dynamoer for båt; Forgassere og deler for båt; Motorkontroller for båt; Tenningsdeler for båt; Impellere for båt; Motorlåser for båt; Motorfester for båt; Stempler og deler for båt; Propeller for båt
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Dele og tilbehør til fartøjer > Motordele til fartøjer: Vekselstrømsgeneratorer til fartøjer; Karburatorer og dele til fartøjer; Motorkontrolenheder til fartøjer; Tændingsdele til fartøjer; Kompressorhjul til fartøjer; Motorlåse til fartøjer; Motorophæng; Stempler og dele til fartøjer; Propeller til fartøjer
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Dijelovi i dodaci za plovila > Dijelovi motora za plovila: Alternatori za plovila; Rasplinjači i dijelovi za plovila; Kontrole motora plovila; Dijelovi za paljenje plovila; Impeleri za plovila; Brave za motor za plovila; Nosači motora za plovila; Klipovi i dijelovi za plovila; Propeleri za plovila
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Acessórios e peças para embarcações > Peças de motor para embarcações: Alternadores para embarcações; Peças e carburadores para embarcações; Controlos de motor para embarcações; Peças de ignição para embarcações; Turbinas para embarcações; Bloqueios de motor para embarcações; Apoios de motor para embarcações; Peças e pistões para embarcações; Hélices para embarcações
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Vandens transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Vandens transporto priemonių variklių dalys: Vandens transporto priemonių kintamosios srovės generatoriai; Vandens transporto priemonių karbiuratoriai ir dalys; Vandens transporto priemonių variklio valdikliai; Vandens transporto priemonių uždegimo dalys; Vandens transporto priemonių impeleriai; Vandens transporto priemonių variklių užraktai; Vandens transporto priemonių variklių laikikliai; Vandens transporto priemonių stūmokliai ir dalys; Vandens transporto priemonių sraigtai
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เรือ > อะไหล่เครื่องยนต์เรือ: เครื่องกำเนิดไฟฟ้าสลับของเรือ; คาร์บูเรเตอร์และชิ้นส่วนเรือ; อุปกรณ์ควบคุมเครื่องยนต์เรือ; อุปกรณ์จุดระเบิดเรือ; จานใบพัดเรือ; ล็อกเครื่องยนต์เรือ; ที่ติดตั้งเครื่องยนต์เรือ; ชิ้นส่วนและลูกสูบของเรือ; ใบพัดเรือ
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Запчасти и аксессуары для водного транспорта > Детали двигателей для водного транспорта: Генераторы для водного транспорта; Карбюраторы для водного транспорта и их детали; Оборудование для управления двигателями для водного транспорта; Детали системы зажигания для водного транспорта; Импеллеры для водного транспорта; Замки для моторов для водного транспорта; Крепления для моторов для водного транспорта; Поршни для водного транспорта и их детали; Гребные винты для водного транспорта
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Wasserfahrzeugteile & Zubehör > Wasserfahrzeugmotorteile: Wasserfahrzeuglichtmaschinen; Wasserfahrzeugvergaser & Teile; Wasserfahrzeugmotorsteuerung; Wasserfahrzeug-Zündungsteile; Wasserfahrzeug Laufrad; Motorschlösser für Wasserfahrzeuge; Motorlager für Wasserfahrzeuge; Wasserfahrzeugkolben & Teile; Wasserfahrzeugpropeller
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Parti e accessori imbarcazioni > Parti motore imbarcazioni: Alternatori imbarcazioni; Carburatori e parti imbarcazioni; Comandi motore imbarcazioni; Parti ignizione imbarcazioni; Giranti imbarcazioni; Bloccaggi motore imbarcazioni; Supporti motore imbarcazioni; Pistoni e parti imbarcazioni; Eliche imbarcazioni
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Su Jetli Tekne Parçaları ve Aksesuarları > Tekne Motoru Parçaları: Tekne Alternatörleri; Tekne Karbüratörleri ve Parçaları; Tekne Motor Kontrolleri; Tekne Ateşleme Parçaları; Tekne Çarkları; Tekne Motor Kilitleri; Tekne Motor Kapakları; Tekne Piston ve Parçaları; Tekne Pervaneleri
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Veneen osat ja tarvikkeet > Veneen moottorin osat: Veneen latausgeneraattorit; Veneen kaasuttimet ja osat; Veneen moottorin hallintalaitteet; Veneen sytytystulpat; Veneen siipipyörät; Veneen moottorin lukot; Veneen moottorin asennustelineet; Veneen männät ja osat; Veneen potkurit
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 船艇零件/配件 > 船艇引擎零件: 船艇交流發電機; 船艇化油器和零件; 船艇引擎控制; 船艇點火裝置零件; 船艇葉輪; 船艇馬達鎖; 船艇馬達架; 船艇發動機活塞和零件; 船艇推進器
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Części i akcesoria do jednostek pływających > Części silników do jednostek pływających: Alternatory do jednostek pływających; Gaźniki i części gaźników do jednostek pływających; Elementy sterowania silnikiem do jednostek pływających; Części układu zapłonowego do jednostek pływających; Wirniki do jednostek pływających; Blokady napędu do jednostek pływających; Mocowania silnika do jednostek pływających; Tłoki do jednostek pływających i ich części; Śruby napędowe do jednostek pływających
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Díly a příslušenství k motorovým člunům > Díly motorů motorových člunů: Alternátory pro motorové čluny; Karburátory motorových člunů a jejich součásti; Ovládání motorů motorových člunů; Zapalování motorových člunů a jeho součásti; Rotory motorových člunů; Zámky motoru pro motorové čluny; Nosníky motorů motorových člunů; Písty motorových člunů a jejich součásti; Lodní šrouby motorových člunů
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Watercraft Parts & Accessories > Watercraft Engine Parts: Watercraft Alternators; Watercraft Carburetors & Parts; Watercraft Engine Controls; Watercraft Ignition Parts; Watercraft Impellers; Watercraft Motor Locks; Watercraft Motor Mounts; Watercraft Pistons & Parts; Watercraft Propellers
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Accesorios y piezas para embarcaciones > Piezas de motor de embarcaciones: Alternadores para embarcaciones; Piezas y carburadores para embarcaciones; Controles para motor de embarcaciones; Piezas de ignición para embarcaciones; Propulsores para embarcaciones; Esclusas de motor de embarcaciones; Soportes para motor de embarcaciones; Piezas y pistones de embarcaciones; Hélices de embarcaciones
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Pièces détachées et accessoires nautiques > Pièces de moteur de bateau: Alternateurs marins; Carburateurs et pièces détachées; Commandes moteur de bateau; Pièces d’allumage pour bateaux; Turbines de bateau; Dispositifs de blocage pour moteur de bateau; Supports pour moteur de bateau; Pistons et pièces détachées de bateau; Hélices de bateau
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre plavidlá > Diely motora plavidla: Alternátory pre plavidlá; Karburátory a diely pre plavidlá; Ovládanie motora plavidla; Časti zapaľovania plavidla; Obežné kolesá čerpadla pre plavidlá; Zámky motora plavidla; Držiaky motora plavidla; Piesty a diely pre plavidlá; Lodné vrtule
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Части и аксесоари за плавателни съдове > Части за двигатели на плавателни съдове: Алтернатори за плавателни съдове; Карбуратори и части за плавателни съдове; Управление за двигатели на плавателни съдове; Части за запалване на плавателни съдове; Турбини за плавателни съдове; Ключалки за двигатели на плавателни съдове; Стойки за двигатели на плавателни съдове; Бутала и части за плавателни съдове; Витла за плавателни съдове
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 船舶パーツ・関連用品 > 船舶用エンジンパーツ: 船舶用オルタネーター; 船舶用キャブレター・関連パーツ; 船舶用エンジンコントロール; 船舶用イグニッションパーツ; 船舶用インペラー; 船舶用モーターロック; 船舶用モーターマウント; 船舶用ピストン・関連パーツ; 船舶用プロペラ
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Delar och tillbehör till fartyg > Motordelar till fartyg: Växelströmsgeneratorer till fartyg; Förgasare och delar till fartyg; Motorreglage till fartyg; Tändningsdelar till fartyg; Kompressorhjul för fartyg; Motorlås för fartyg; Motorfästen för fartyg; Kolvar och delar för fartyg; Propellrar för fartyg
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Vízijármű-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Vízijárműmotor-alkatrészek: Vízijármű-generátorok; Vízijármű-karburátorok és -alkatrészek; Vízijármű-motorvezérlés; Vízijármű-gyújtóalkatrészek; Vízijármű-hajtóművek; Vízijármű-motorzárak; Vízijármű-motorrögzítők; Vízijármű-dugattyúk és -alkatrészek; Vízijármű-propellerek
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 船艇零件/配件 > 船用发动机配件: 船舶发电机; 船舶化油器及配件; 船舶引擎控制; 船舶点火装置部件; 船舶叶轮; 船舶电机锁; 船舶电机底座; 船舶活塞及配件; 船舶推进器
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 선박 부품/부대용품 > 선박 엔진 부품: 선박용 교류 발전기; 선박 기화기/부품; 선박용 엔진 제어장치; 선박 점화 부품; 선박 임펠러; 선박용 모터 잠금 장치; 선박 모터 마운트; 선박 피스톤/부품; 선박 프로펠러
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Peças e acessórios para embarcações > Peças de motor de embarcações: Alternadores de embarcações; Carburadores e peças de embarcações; Controles de motor de embarcações; Peças de ignição de embarcações; Rotores de embarcações; Travas de motor de embarcações; Engates de motor de embarcações; Pistões e peças de embarcações; Hélices de embarcações